Arkansas, session 2025, HB1256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-27-302, concerning the qualifications to
become a licensed associate counselor, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) Upon application and satisfactory documentation of all
requirements, the board shall issue a provisional license to an applicant to
be a licensed associate counselor if he or she qualifies under this section.
(2) A provisional license under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section:
(A) Is valid for one (1) year and up to three (3) attempts
to pass the examination under § 17-27-306; and
(B) Cannot be renewed.

*JMB129*
02-17-2025 08:58:50 JMB129

As Engrossed: H2/17/25 HB1256
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-27-305, concerning the qualifications
for a licensed associate marriage and family therapist, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) Upon application and satisfactory documentation of all
requirements, the board shall issue a provisional license to an applicant to
be a licensed associate marriage and family therapist if he or she qualifies
under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A provisional license under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section:
(A) Is valid for one (1) year and up to three (3) attempts
to pass the examination under § 17-27-306; and
(B) Cannot be renewed.
/s/Wooldridge























02-17-2025 08:58:50 JMB129